Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,169
Beekeeping; infected bees or apiaries; nuisance; destruction.

Infected shipments, apiaries in which the existing disease, parasite, or pest cannot be successfully treated, apiaries which are affected by a disease, parasite, or pest amenable to treatment but which have not been treated as provided in section 81-2,168, and apiaries having bees in hives without movable frames or any colonies of bees or shipments of used bee equipment which entered this state illegally are declared to be a public nuisance and menace to the community, and the officers and employees of the department may destroy by burning or otherwise, without any remuneration to the owner, any box hives or infected bees, hives, or used bee equipment found therein.

Laws 1929, c. 9, § 5, p. 78;

C.S.1929, § 81-2705;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,169;

Laws 1965, c. 548, § 5, p. 1756;

Laws 1986, LB 1001, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 7.